Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
SEPARATION

§580-71 Grounds for separation. The
family court may decree a separation from bed and board for a period not to
exceed two years in any matrimonial action upon a petition for separation when
the court finds the marriage is temporarily disrupted. [CC 1859, §1336; am L
1903, c 22, §10; RL 1925, §2987; RL 1935, §4484; am L Sp 1941, c 93, §1; RL
1945, §12235; RL 1955, §324-60; HRS §580-71; am L 1973, c 211, §5(s); am L
1976, c 140, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next